ro-RO: Materialul tecii: Aliaj 600; Ceramică; Cupru; Fibră de sticlă; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nichel; Oțel inoxidabil; Teflon (PTFE); Altele
en: Sheath material: Alloy 600; Ceramic; Copper; Fiberglass; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nickel; Stainless steel; Teflon (PTFE); Other
zh-TW: 護套材質: 600 合金; 陶瓷; 紅銅; 玻璃纖維; 哈氏合金; 英高鎳合金; 鎳; 不銹鋼; 鐵氟龍 (聚四氟乙烯); 其他
lt-LT: Apsauginio dėklo medžiaga: 600 lydinys; Keramika; Varis; Stiklo pluoštas; „Hastelloy“ lydinys; „Inconel“ lydinys; Nikelis; Nerūdijantysis plienas; „Teflon“ (PTFE); Kita
da: Hylstermateriale: Alloy 600; Keramik; Kobber; Glasfiber; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nikkel; Rustfrit stål; Teflon (PTFE); Andet
hu: Tok anyaga: 600-as ötvözet; Kerámia; Réz; Üveggyapot; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nikkel; Rozsdamentes acél; Teflon (PTFE); Egyéb
pl: Typ osłony: Stop 600; Ceramika; Miedź; Włókno szklane; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nikiel; Stal nierdzewna; Teflon (PTFE); Inne
sl-SI: Material plašča: Zlitina 600; Keramika; Baker; Steklena vlakna; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nikelj; Nerjavno jeklo; Teflon (PTFE); Druga
ja: シース素材: 合金600; セラミック; 銅; ファイバーグラス; ハステロイ; インコネル; ニッケル; ステンレススチール; テフロン（PTFE）; その他
tr: Kılıf malzemesi: Alaşım 600; Seramik; Bakır; Fiberglas; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nikel; Paslanmaz çelik; Teflon (PTFE); Diğer
ko: 쉬스 재질: 합금 600; 세라믹; 구리; 유리 섬유; 하스텔로이; 인코넬; 니켈; 스테인리스 스틸; Teflon(폴리테트라플루오로에틸렌); 기타
el: Υλικό θήκης: Κράμα 600; Κεραμικό; Χαλκός; Υαλοΐνες; Χάστελοϊ; Ινκόνελ; Νικέλιο; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Teflon (PTFE); Άλλο
ru: Материал оболочки: Сплав 600; Керамика; Медь; Стекловолокно; Хастеллой; Инконель; Никель; Нержавеющая сталь; Teflon (ПТФЭ); Другой
fi: Tupen materiaali: Seos 600; Keraaminen; Kupari; Lasikuitu; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nikkeli; Ruostumaton teräs; Teflon (polytetrafluorieteeni); Muu
th: วัสดุหุ้ม: อัลลอย 600; เซรามิก; ทองแดง; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; ฮัสเทลลอย; อินโคเนล; นิกเกิล; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เทฟลอน (PTFE); อื่นๆ
sv: Sheath material: Legering 600; Keramisk; Koppar; Glasfiber; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nickel; Rostfritt stål; Teflon (polytetrafluoreten); Annat
it: Materiale della guaina: Lega 600; Ceramica; Rame; Vetroresina; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nickel; Acciaio inossidabile; Teflon (politetrafluoroetilene); Altro
de: Hüllenmaterial: Legierung 600; Keramik; Kupfer; Fiberglas; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nickel; Edelstahl; Teflon (Polytetrafluorethylen); Sonstiges
cs: Materiál pláště: Alloy 600; Keramika; Měď; Skelná vata; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nikl; Nerezová ocel; Teflon (PTFE); Jiné
nl: Materiaal van de schede: Legering 600; Keramiek; Koper; Glasvezel; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nikkel; Roestvrij staal; Teflon (polytetrafluorethyleen); Overig
es: Material de la funda: Alloy 600; Cerámica; Cobre; Fibra de vidrio; Hastelloy; Inconel; Níquel; Acero inoxidable; Teflon (politetrafluoroetileno); Otros
fr: Composition de la gaine: Alliage 600; Céramique; Cuivre; Fibre de verre; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nickel; Acier inoxydable; Téflon (PTFE); Autre
pt-PT: Material da bainha: Liga 600; Cerâmica; Cobre; Fibra de vidro; Hastelloy; Inconel; Níquel; Aço inoxidável; Teflon (PTFE); Outro
nb: Hylsemateriale: Legering 600; Keramikk; Kobber; Glassfiber; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nikkel; Rustfritt stål; Teflon (polytetrafluoretylen); Annet
sk-SK: Materiál plášťa: Zliatina 600; Keramika; Meď; Sklolaminát; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nikel; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Teflon (PTFE); Iné
bg-BG: Материал на обвивката: Сплав 600; Керамика; Мед; Фибростъкло; Hastelloy; Inconel; Никел; Неръждаема стомана; Тефлон (PTFE); Друго
pt-BR: Material da bainha: Liga 600; Cerâmica; Cobre; Fibra de vidro; Hastelloy; Inconel; Níquel; Aço inoxidável; Teflon (PTFE); Outro
zh-CN: 护套材质: 合金 600; 陶瓷; 铜; 玻璃纤维; 哈氏合金; 因科镍合金; 镍; 不锈钢; Teflon（聚四氟乙烯）; 其他
vi: Chất liệu bao vỏ: Hợp kim 600; Gốm; Màu đồng đỏ; Sợi thủy tinh; Hợp kim Hastelloy; Hợp kim Inconel; Niken; Thép không gỉ; Teflon (PTFE); Khác
hr-HR: Materijal futrole: Legura 600; Keramika; Bakar; Stakloplastika; Hastelloy; Inconel; Nikal; Nehrđajući čelik; Teflon (PTFE); Ostalo